Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.220.030

Traffic safety education section—Administration of traffic safety education program—Certification and endorsement of qualified teachers of driver training—Powers and duties of school officials—Administration of knowledge and driving portions of driver licensing examination.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to establish a section of traffic safety education, and through such section shall: Define appropriate course delivery standards required to provide an effective driver training education course, establish a level of driving competency required of each student to successfully complete the course, and ensure that an effective statewide program is implemented and sustained; administer, supervise, and develop the traffic safety education program; and assist local school districts and approved private schools in the conduct of their traffic safety education programs. The superintendent shall adopt necessary rules governing the operation and scope of the traffic safety education program; and each school district and approved private school shall submit a report to the superintendent on the condition of its traffic safety education program: PROVIDED, That the superintendent shall monitor the quality of the program and carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2)(a) The board of directors of any school district maintaining a secondary school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, or any approved private school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, may establish and maintain a traffic safety education program.

(b) Any school district or approved private school that offers a driver training education course must certify to the department of licensing that it is operating a traffic safety education program, that the driver training education course follows the curriculum promulgated by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of licensing, that it meets the course delivery standards promulgated by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, that a record retention policy is in place to meet the requirements of subsection (5) of this section, and that the school district or approved private school has verified that all instructors are authorized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to teach a driver training education course.

(c) Any portion of a driver training education course offered by a school district may be taught before or after regular school hours or on Saturdays as well as on regular school days or as a summer school course, at the option of the local school district. If a school district elects to offer a driver training education course and has within its boundaries a private accredited secondary school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, at least one driver training education course must be given at times other than regular school hours if there is sufficient demand for it.

(3)(a) A qualified teacher of driver training education must be certificated under chapter 28A.410 RCW and obtain a traffic safety endorsement or a letter of approval to teach traffic safety education from the superintendent of public instruction to teach either the classroom instruction or the behind-the-wheel instruction portion of the driver training education course, or both, under rules adopted by the superintendent. The classroom or behind-the-wheel instruction portion of the driver training education course may also be taught by instructors certificated under rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction, exclusive of any requirement that the instructor be certificated under chapter 28A.410 RCW.

(b) The superintendent shall establish a required minimum number of hours of continuing traffic safety education for qualified teachers of driver training education.

(4) The board of directors of a school district, or combination of school districts, may contract with any driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW to teach the behind-the-wheel instruction portion of the driver training education course. Instructors provided by any such contracting driver training school must be properly qualified teachers of driver training education under the joint qualification requirements adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and the director of licensing.

(5) Each school district or approved private school offering a traffic safety education program must maintain: (a) Documentation of each instructor's name and address and that establishes the instructor as a qualified teacher of driver training education as defined in RCW 28A.220.020; and (b) student records that include the student's name, address, and telephone number, the date of enrollment and all dates of instruction, the student's driver's instruction permit or driver's license number, the type of training received, the total number of hours of instruction, and the name of the instructor or instructors. These records must be maintained for three years following the completion of the instruction and are subject to inspection upon request of the department of licensing or the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent may adopt rules regarding the retention of additional documents that are subject to inspection by the department of licensing or the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(6) A driver training education course may not be offered by a school district or an approved private school to a student who is under the age of fifteen, and behind-the-wheel instruction may not be given by an instructor to a student in a motor vehicle unless the student possesses either a current and valid driver's instruction permit issued under RCW 46.20.055 or a current and valid driver's license.

(7) School districts that offer a driver training education course under this chapter may administer the portions of the driver licensing examination that test the applicant's knowledge of traffic laws and ability to safely operate a motor vehicle as authorized under RCW 46.20.120(7). The superintendent shall work with the department of licensing, in consultation with school districts that offer a traffic safety education program, to develop standards and requirements for administering each portion of the driver licensing examination that are comparable to the standards and requirements for driver training schools under RCW 46.82.450.

(8) Before a school district may provide a portion of the driver licensing examination, the school district must, after consultation with the superintendent, enter into an agreement with the department of licensing that sets forth an accountability and audit process that takes into account the unique nature of school district facilities and school hours and, at a minimum, contains provisions that:

(a) Allow the department of licensing to conduct random examinations, inspections, and audits without prior notice;

(b) Allow the department of licensing to conduct on-site inspections at least annually;

(c) Allow the department of licensing to test, at least annually, a random sample of the drivers approved by the school district for licensure and to cancel any driver's license that may have been issued to any driver selected for testing who refuses to be tested; and

(d) Reserve to the department of licensing the right to take prompt and appropriate action against a school district that fails to comply with state or federal standards for a driver licensing examination or to comply with any terms of the agreement.

[ 2017 c 197 s 3; 2011 c 370 s 2; 2000 c 115 s 9; 1979 c 158 s 196; 1977 c 76 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 2; 1963 c 39 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.08.020, 46.81.020.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 c 197: See notes following RCW 28A.220.020.

Intent—2011 c 370: "It is the intent of the legislature to utilize the infrastructure and resources of the commercial driver training schools and the school districts' traffic safety education programs by authorizing these entities to provide driver licensing examinations. The legislature intends for the department of licensing to authorize the administration of driver licensing examinations by these entities in order to maintain and reprioritize its staff for the purpose of reducing the wait times at its driver licensing offices.

Further, the legislature recognizes the growing importance of the work performed by department of licensing driver licensing services employees, who play an increasingly vital role in our security by ensuring that applicants are properly issued identification." [ 2011 c 370 s 1.]

Inclusion of stakeholder groups in communications to facilitate transition of driver licensing examination administration—2011 c 370: See note following RCW 46.82.450.

Finding—2000 c 115: See note following RCW 46.20.075.

Effective date—2000 c 115 ss 1-10: See note following RCW 46.20.075.

Severability—1977 c 76: See note following RCW 28A.220.010.